Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.030

Refunding bonds may be exchanged for bonds to be refunded or sold.

Any refunding bonds issued may be delivered in exchange for the bonds to be refunded or may be sold in such manner and at such price as the governing body may in its discretion determine advisable.

[ 1999 c 230 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 25 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—Severability—1999 c 230: See notes following RCW 39.53.010.